Massachusetts, session 194th, H4577.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1.  There is hereby imposed a real estate transfer fee equal to 0.5% (half 
percent, ½%) of the purchase price upon the transfer of any real property interest in any real 
property situated in the town of Provincetown.  Said fee shall be the liability of the purchaser of 
such property interest, and any agreement between the purchaser and the seller or any other 
person with reference to the allocation of the responsibility for bearing said fee shall not affect 
such liability of the purchaser.  The fee shall be paid to the town of Provincetown.  The first 
$250,000 collected in each fiscal year shall be deposited in the town’s capital improvement 
stabilization fund.  The remaining funds collected each fiscal year shall be deposited into the 
town’s general fund. 

of 3 10  SECTION 2.  The following transfers of real property interests shall be exempt from the 
real estate transfer fee:  
A. First time homebuyers who live in the home for at least 5 years.  A lien shall 
accompany the deed stating that “There is running with the land a lien equal to the amount of fee 
exempted, plus accumulated interest and penalties until such time as all conditions of this sub-
section are met.” 
B. Transfers to the government of the U.S., the commonwealth, the town of 
Provincetown and any of their instrumentalities, agencies or sub-divisions, such as the 
Provincetown housing authority.  
C. Transfers made without additional consideration to confirm, correct, modify or 
supplement a transfer previously made.  
D. Transfers of convenience with consideration under $100.00 which include: name 
change, into trusts, out of trust, etc.  
E. Transfers to any charitable organization as defined in clause third of section five of 
chapter 59 of the General Laws or any religious organization providing that the real property 
interests so transferred will be held solely for public charitable or religious purposes.  
F. Transfers between family members, marriage partners, parents and children, 
grandchildren, stepparents and stepchildren, brothers and sisters.  
SECTION 3.   
A. The fee imposed shall be due at the time of the transfer of the real property interest.  

of 3 30  B. The buyer shall pay interest on any unpaid amount of the fee at the rate the town 
collects on unpaid real estate taxes. 
C. The town shall notify a buyer by registered or certified mail of any failure to discharge 
the amount in full of fee due.  
D. All fees and interest required to be paid under this act shall constitute a personal debt 
of the buyer and may be recovered in an action of contract; 
SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect on passage.